Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5074YH (3) 91 sc/ns H.F. 2141 Section 1. SHORT TITLE. This Act shall be known and may be 1 cited as the âIowa-Illinois Boundary Adjustment Actâ. 2 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 1.19 Iowa-Illinois boundary adjustment 3 committee. 4 1. The Iowa-Illinois boundary adjustment committee is 5 established for the purpose of discussing and recommending 6 whether to adjust the boundary between the state of Iowa and 7 the state of Illinois by transferring one or more Illinois 8 counties along the Iowa border to the state of Iowa. The 9 committee shall consist of the following members: 10 a. Six individuals from the state of Iowa who are not 11 members of the general assembly and are appointed by the 12 governor. No more than four members appointed under this 13 paragraph shall be members of the same political party. 14 b. Five individuals from the state of Illinois appointed 15 under Illinois law. 16 2. The governor shall notify the governor of the state 17 of Illinois when the governor has appointed members to the 18 committee. 19 3. The governor shall schedule the first meeting of the 20 committee no later than September 1, 2026. At the committeeâs 21 first meeting, the committee shall elect a chairperson from the 22 members of the committee. 23 4. The committee shall meet at least once each calendar 24 year. The committee may meet more frequently at the call of 25 the chairperson or at the request of a majority of the members 26 of the committee. 27 5. Iowa members shall be appointed to terms of four years. 28 An Iowa member may be reappointed to successive terms. The 29 governor shall fill a vacancy for an Iowa member for the 30 unexpired portion of the term. 31 6. Six members shall constitute a quorum. A quorum is 32 necessary for the committee to take official action but is not 33 required for the committee to meet, take testimony, and hold 34 discussion. 35 -1- LSB 5074YH (3) 91 sc/ns 1/ 2 H.F. 2141 7. The governor shall designate an agency of the executive 1 branch to provide administrative assistance to the committee. 2 8. Not later than sixty days after the completion of the 3 committeeâs duties under this section, the committee shall 4 submit a report to the general assembly and the general 5 assembly of Illinois. The report must include the committeeâs 6 recommendations, including any legislation recommended by the 7 committee, and a summary of the committeeâs work. 8 9. The committee is not subject to section 4A.5. 9 10. This section is repealed July 1 following the submission 10 of the committeeâs required report to the general assembly. 11 The chairperson shall notify the Iowa Code editor when the 12 report is submitted to the general assembly. 13